Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB181.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 1144. Transparency of political subdivision authorities.All authorities created by a political subdivision shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website which includes the following:(1) the name of each board member of the authority;(2) the length and expiration date of the term to which each board member was appointed;(3) an email address which may be used to contact each board member;12345678910111213141516171819 (4) the name and office of the individual who appointed each board member; and(5) the publicly accessible Internet website of the government entity that established the authority.§ 5624. Transparency of municipal authority.An authority shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website which includes the following:(1) the name of each board member of the authority;(2) the length and expiration date of the term to which each board member was appointed;(3) an email address which may be used to contact each board member;(4) the name of the municipality that appointed each board member; and(5) the publicly accessible Internet website of the municipality that established the authority or, in cases of authorities established by multiple municipalities, the publicly accessible Internet website of each municipality that established the authority.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0181PN0128 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920